updated/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAo</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>jAiye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gayA</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaye</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaI</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>gayIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>gaIM</l><r>jA<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--vAl/A__n is covered by kAl/A__n except the case 'vAliyAz' . So removing vAl/A__n paradigm. Suggested by Chaitanya Sir.-->
<pardef n="kAl/A__n">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>				


<pardef n="rAw/a__n">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="BIda/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ASA/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e r ="LR"><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e> 
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="gudiy/A__n">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Az</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="IrRyA/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Apawwi/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAz</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yoM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="SAnwi/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ladak/I__n">
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAz</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					

<e lm="aMgarakRA"><i>aMgarakRA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anavasWiwi"><i>anavasWiwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aruci"><i>aruci</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ASA"><i>ASA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asamiyA"><i>asamiyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asi"><i>asi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Awmajaya"><i>Awmajaya</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ayukwi"><i>ayukwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="azXeriyA"><i>azXeriyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="baDZiyA"><i>baDZiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="barPa"><i>barP</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="BattArikA"><i>BattArikA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BaviRyavANI"><i>BaviRyavAN</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="BeMta"><i>BeMta</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="boriyA"><i>boriy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmagraMWi"><i>brahmagraMWi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="CAzha"><i>CAzha</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cIKapukAra"><i>cIKapukAr</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ciwrokwi"><i>ciwrokwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="corI"><i>cor</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="GAGarA"><i>GAGar</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="gaNiwa"><i>gaNiwa</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gomAwA"><i>gomAwA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="guMbaxa"><i>guMbax</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="haMdiyA"><i>haMdiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="harikAMwA"><i>harikAMwA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ilAhI"><i>ilAh</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="Jilamila"><i>Jilamila</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jilxa"><i>jilx</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kAlikA"><i>kAlikA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalpanASakwi"><i>kalpanASakwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Kixamawa"><i>Kixamaw</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kliRtawA"><i>kliRtawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kodI"><i>kod</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuMdA"><i>kuMd</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="lakRyasixXi"><i>lakRyasixXi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="laya"><i>laya</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAcisa"><i>mAcis</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahArAwri"><i>mahArAwri</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAXurI"><i>mAXur</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="maXyA"><i>maXyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="maXyamA"><i>maXyamA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="melA"><i>mel</i><par n="kAl/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="nAKa"><i>nAK</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="navaSakwi"><i>navaSakwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="parasparawA"><i>parasparaw</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="pariwqpwi"><i>pariwqpwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="parNakutI"><i>parNakut</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="PatakAra"><i>PatakAra</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pezga"><i>pezg</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="prajAwA"><i>prajAwA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawimUrwi"><i>prawimUrwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawipaxA"><i>prawipaxA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prewaSuxXi"><i>prewaSuxXi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rUDi"><i>rUDi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sabjI"><i>sabj</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="saMXi"><i>saMXi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saMXyA"><i>saMXyA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sArA"><i>sAr</i><par n="kAl/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="saralA"><i>saral</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sarma"><i>Sarma</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAXanA"><i>sAXanA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sOra"><i>sOr</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="SruwikIrwi"><i>SruwikIrwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="suI"><i>su</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="vAlA"><i>vAl</i><par n="kAl/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="vaMSaSalAkA"><i>vaMSaSalAkA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="varNavivqwi"><i>varNavivqwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="viciwrawA"><i>viciwrawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="viktoriyA"><i>viktoriy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="wamIja"><i>wamIja</i><par n="BIda/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wiwalI"><i>wiwal</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="xopahara"><i>xopahar</i><par n="rAw/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="xuRkIrwi"><i>xuRkIrwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xyUwakrIdA"><i>xyUwakrIdA</i><par n="ASA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yaSoXarA"><i>yaSoXar</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
